src/fst/morphology/incoming/bop.lexc
LEXICON TImpStems
<{белј´еза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS» «Exc2»] [[[za|na|ot]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!beljéza- -> note
<{б´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[v|do|za|iz|na|ot|po|pod|[fpo sot nto]|pre|fpri sdo|pro|raz|s|fs sdo|u]naimp]|dp]>	Des;		!bíj- -> beat
<{бл´иза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[iz|o|[po nto]]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!blíza- -> lick
<{бод´} 0:«CS» [[[za|iz|na|ot|pro|u]naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!bod´- -> gore
<{б´ъхта} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[na naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!býxta- -> beat
<{б´ърса} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[iz|za|o|[fpo sza nto]]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!býrsa- -> wipe
<{б¶р´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[[po|za|fpo sna|fpo ssy]nto]|do|iz|na|o|ot|pod|fpre siz|pri|pro|raz|s|sy]naimp]|dp]> Des;		!b#rá- -> take

<{в´аја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[iz naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!vája- -> chisel
<{вез´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS» «Exc4»] dp>										Des;		!vezá- -> embroider
<{велич´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[vyz naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!veličáj- -> extol
<{вещ´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[za|u]naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!veštáj- -> prophesy
<{в´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[za|iz|na|nad|ot|po|pre|pri|raz|s|u]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!víj- -> wind
<{владј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[za naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!vladjéj- -> own
<{влјек´} 0:«CS» [[[do|iz|na|ot|po|fpo su|pri|pro|raz|u]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!vljek´- -> pull
<{въртј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|na|ot|po|fpo sza|fpo sna|fpo sraz|pre|raz|[s nto]|u]naimp]|dp]>		Des;		!vyrtjé- -> revolve
<{върш´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[iz|na|o|[po nto]]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!vyršá- -> thresh
<{върш´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[iz|na|o|[po nto]]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!vyršéj- -> thresh (variant)
<{вј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[do|za|iz|na|ob|ot|po|raz]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!vjéj- -> blow
<{в¶рј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[v|za|na|pro|s]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!v#rjé- -> shove

<{гл´еда} 0:«VS» [[[[[do|po|pro]nto]|v|za|iz|na|o|ot|pre|raz|s|sy]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!gléda- -> watch
<{гл´озга} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[po nto]|iz|o]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!glózga- -> gnaw
<{горј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[[do|za|po|pre|raz]nto]|iz|na|ob|pro]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!gorjé- -> burn
<{градј´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[v|fvyz sna|za|iz|na|o|ob|pre|pri|raz|sy]naimp]|dp]>				Des;		!gradjí- -> build
<{гриз´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS» «Exc4»] [[[iz|na|o|pre|pro|s]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!grizá- -> gnaw
<{грј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[za|[[iz|po|fpo sza|fpo sna]nto]|na|o|pod|pre|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>			Des;		!grjéj- -> give warmth
<{гълч´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[na|s]naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!gylčá- -> scold

<{дад´} 0:«CS» [[[v|za|iz|na|[[nad|pri|u]nto]|ot|po|pre|fpre siz|fpre spo|fpre spro|pro|raz|fraz spro]naimp]|dp]> Des;		!dad´- -> give
<{др´аска} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|fiz spo|na|o|fpo siz|[po nto]]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!dráska- -> scratch
<{душ´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!dušá- -> choke
<{душ´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|s|u]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!duší- -> choke (variant)
<{д´ъвка} 0:[(«Trunc») «VS»] [[[pre|s]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!dývka- -> chew
<{дълб´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[v|za|iz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!dylbáj- -> chisel
<{държ´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[vyz|za|iz|po|pod|fpo sza|s|u]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!dyržá- -> hold
<{д¶р´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[za nto]|iz|fiz spo|na|o|pro|raz|sy]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!d#rá- -> flay

<{жел´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[po naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!želáj- -> wish
<{ж´ъна} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|iz|nad|o|[[za|po]nto]]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!žýna- -> reap

<{зов´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[na|ot|[[o|po]nto]|pri]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!zová- -> call

<{игр´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[[[po|fpo sob|fpo sraz]nto]|do|za|iz|na|nad|ob|ot|pod|pre|pro|raz]naimp]|dp]>	Des;		!igráj- -> play

<{клад´} 0:«CS» dp>												Des;		!klad´- -> make a fire
<{кл´епа} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[iz naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!klépa- -> hammer
<{ков´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[v|do|za|iz|na|o|ob|ot|[po nto]|pod|pri|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>				Des;		!ková- -> forge
<{к´олји} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|na nto]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!kólji- -> slaughter
<{коп´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[[[po|na]nto]|v|do|za|iz|o|ot|pod|pre|pro|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>			Des;		!kopáj- -> dig
<{крад´} 0:«CS» [[[o|ot|po|fpo sot]naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!krad´- -> steal
<{кр´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[fdo sraz|za|ot|po|pri|raz|s|u]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!kríj- -> hide
<{кълв´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[na|[po nto]]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!kylvá- -> peck
<{к´ъпа} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[iz|o|fpo siz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!kýpa- -> give a bath

<{ласк´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[po|pri]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!laskáj- -> flatter
<{л´ъга} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|nad|[[po|fpo ss|pre|s]nto]|pod|pri]naimp]|dp]>				Des;		!lýga- -> lie
<{лј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[v|do|za|na|ob|ot|po|pod|pre|pri|pro|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>				Des;		!ljéj- -> pour

<{м´аза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|na|o|po|[pod nto]|fpo sza|fpo sna|pre|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>			Des;		!máza- -> spread
<{мет´} 0:«CS» [[[do|[[za|po|fpo siz]nto]|iz|fna ss|o|pod|pre|s]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!met´- -> sweep
<{мечт´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[za|raz|[na nto]]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!mečtáj- -> dream
<{м´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[[[za|pod]nto]|iz|ot|fpo siz|pre|pro|s|u]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!míj- -> wash
<{мот´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[za|iz|na|o|ot|fpo sna|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!motáj- -> wind
<{мълвј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[pro naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!mylvjé- -> utter
<{м´ъмра} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[s naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!mýmra- -> scold
<{м´¶лје} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|po|pre|s]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!m´#lje- -> mill

<{нес´} 0:«CS» [[[v|vyz|do|za|iz|na|ot|po|pod|pre|pri|fpro siz|raz|s|u]naimp]|dp]>				Des;		!nes´- -> carry
<{н´иза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[za nto]|iz|na|pro|raz]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!níza- -> thread

<{ор´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[[za|po]nto]|iz|fpo siz|pre|raz]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!orá- -> plow

<{пек´} 0:«CS» [[[do|za|iz|na|o|fpo so|pod|pre|s|[[po|pri]nto]]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!pek´- -> bake
<{п´иса} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[[po|pro|fpo sna|fpo so]nto]|v|do|za|iz|na|nad|o|ot|pod|pre|pred|fpre sza|pri|fpri spod|raz|s]naimp]|dp]> Des; !písa- -> write
<{п´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[v|do|[[fdo siz|za|ot|fpo sna|fpo sot|fpo spre|pre|pri|u]nto]|iz|na|nad|o|po|pro]naimp]|dp]> Des;	!píj- -> drink
<{п´орји} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|fo ss|ot|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!pórji- -> rip
<{п´оска} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[o naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!póska- -> look for lice
<{плет´} 0:«CS» [[[v|do|za|iz|[na nto]|pre|raz|s|u]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!plet´- -> knit
<{пред´} 0:«CS» [[[[za nto]|iz|o]naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!pred´- -> spin
<{пј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[[[na|po|pri|fpre sus|pro|raz|fu ss]nto]|vyz|do|za|iz|nad|o]naimp]|dp]>		Des;		!pjéj- -> sing
<{п¶р´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[za nto]|iz|o|pre]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!p#rá- -> wash

<{р´еса} 0:[«Trunc» «VS» «Exc2»] [[[iz|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!résa- -> comb
<{р´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[za|iz|[[na|s]nto]|ot|pod|raz]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!ríj- -> dig
<{руг´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[[[za|iz]nto]|na|po]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!rugáj- -> revile
<{руш´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[na|raz]naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!ruší- -> destroy
<{рј´еза} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[v|za|iz|na|o|ob|ot|po|pod|fpo sna|fpo so|fpo spod|pre|pro|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>	Des;		!rjéza- -> cut

<{с´ипа} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|za|iz|na|ob|ot|po|[[fpo sna|pri]nto]|pre|raz|sy]naimp]|dp]>			Des;		!sípa- -> shower
<{сјек´} 0:«CS» [[[za|iz|na|po|pod|pre|raz|sy]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!sjek´- -> cut
<{сј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[v|za|na|o|ot|po|pre]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!sjéj- -> sow
<{сј´еја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|na|o|pre|raz]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!sjéja- -> sow (variant)
<{ск´уба} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[iz|na|o|ot|pro]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!skúba- -> pluck
<{см´ука} 0:[(«Trunc») «VS»] [[[v|iz|pro]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!smúka- -> suck
<{стр´ига} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|iz|o|pod|fpo so]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!stríga- -> shear
<{строј´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[v|do|za|nad|po|pre|fpre su|pri|u]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!strojí- -> build
<{ст´ърга} 0:[(«Trunc») «VS»] [[[iz|na|o|[[fpo so|pre]nto]]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!stýrga- -> scrape
<{ст´¶ла} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|na|po|raz]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!st´#la- -> cover
<{с´ука} 0:[(«Trunc») «VS»] [[[za|na|u]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!súka- -> suck, twist

<{твърдј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[v|za|po|u]0:«Exc3» naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!tvyrdjé- -> assert
<{терз´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[iz naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!terzáj- -> torment
<{тр´епа} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[iz|pre|u]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!trépa- -> bash in the head
<{трес´} 0:«CS» [[[za|po|raz]naimp]|dp]>									Des;		!tres´- -> shake
<{тр´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[v|za|iz|na|[[o|po|fpo sna]nto]|pre|pro|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>				Des;		!tríj- -> rub
<{тък´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[[za|po]nto]|v|iz|raz]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!tyká- -> weave
<{тъкмј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!tykmjé- -> prepare
<{тъкмј´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[do|[za nto]|na|pri|s]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!tykmjí- -> prepare (variant)
<{т´ъпка} 0:[(«Trunc») «VS»] [[[[[za|po|fpo sraz|raz]nto]|iz|na|pre|s|u]naimp]|dp]>				Des;		!týpka- -> tread on
<{търпј´е} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[[[po|s]nto]|iz|pre]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!tyrpjé- -> endure

<{х´апа} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|na|ot|pre|u]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!xápa- -> bite

<{ч´ака} 0:«VS» [[[[[za|po]nto]|do|iz|pri]naimp]|dp]>								Des;		!čáka- -> wait
<{черт´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[za|na|o|pod|fpred sna|raz]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!čertáj- -> draw
<{ч´еса} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[v|na|[[za|po]nto]|pri|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!čésa- -> scratch
<{чет´} 0:«CS» [[[[po nto]|do|za|iz|na|ot|fpred spo|pro|raz|s]naimp]|dp]>					Des;		!čet´- -> read

<{ш´иј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] [[[v|za|iz|ob|ot|pod|pri|raz|sy|u]naimp]|dp]>						Des;		!šíj- -> sew

<{щ´ипа} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [[[za|iz|o|ot|pre|pri|u]naimp]|dp]>							Des;		!štípa- -> pinch

<{јад´} 0:«CS» [[[do|fdo siz|[[za|nad|o|pod|fpo spre]nto]|iz|fiz spo|na|pre|pro|raz|u]naimp]|dp]>		Des;		!jad´- -> eat

LEXICON NTDerStems
<{блестј} za>													ava-suff;	!blestj-áva- -> shine
<{болј} [za|ot|po|fpo sna|fpo spri|pre|pri|raz]>								ava-suff;	!bolj-áva- -> hurt
<{бој} po>													ava-suff;	!boj-áva- -> fear
<{бръмч} [za|iz|po]>												ava-suff;	!brymč-áva- -> buzz
<{бумтј} [za|iz|po|pro|raz]>											ava-suff;	!bumtj-áva- -> roar
<{бухтј} iz>													ava-suff;	!buxtj-áva- -> thunder
<{буч} [za|iz]>													ava-suff;	!buč-áva- -> rumble
<{б´ъбрј} [iz|na|po|raz]>											a-suff;		!býbrj-a- -> chatter
<{валј} [iz|na|fpo sna|fpo spre|za|po|pre]>									ava-suff;	!valj-áva- -> rain
<{висј} [iz|na|po]>												ava-suff;	!visj-áva- -> hang
<{врещј} [za|iz|po]>												ava-suff;	!vreštj-áva- -> bleat
<{интерес} [[[za|fpo sza]pto]|po|dp]>										uva-suff;	!interes-úva- -> take interest

LEXICON TDerStems
<{б´и} [v|do|za|iz|na|ot|po|pod|[fpo sot nto]|pre|fpri sdo|pro|raz|s|fs sdo|u]>					va-suff;	!-bí-va- -> beat
<{б´ир} [[[po|za|fpo sna|fpo ssy]nto]|do|iz|na|o|ot|pod|fpre siz|pri|pro|raz|s|sy]>				a-suff;		!-bír-a- -> take
<{бл´из} [iz|o|[po nto]|dp]>											va-suff;	!blíz-va- -> lick
<{божд´} [za|iz|na|ot|pro|u]>											a-suff;		!-božd´-a- -> gore
<{б´ърс} [iz|za|o|[fpo sza nto]]>										va-suff;	!-býrs-va- -> wipe
<{б´ъхт} na>													va-suff;	!-býxt-va- -> beat
<{в´алј} [za|po|pre|pro|raz|s]>											a-suff;		!-valj´-a- -> rain (variant)
<{в´ир} [v|za|na|pro|s]>											a-suff;		!-vír-a- -> shove
<{вонј} [v|za|raz|u]>												ava-suff;	!-vonj-áva- -> stench
<{д´иг} [v|vyz|za|iz|na|po|fpo sv|fpri spo|raz]>								na-suff;	!-díg-na -> raise
<{п´ис} [[[po|pro|fpo sna|fpo so]nto]|v|do|za|iz|na|nad|o|ot|pod|pre|pred|fpre sza|pri|fpri spod|raz|s]>	va-suff;	!-pís-va- -> write (prefixed)
<{пл´ащ} [[[do|fdo siz|na|raz]nto]|za|iz|nad|ot|pred|dp]>							a-suff;		!plášt-a- -> pay
<{хладј} [[[za|fpo sza|fpo so|fpo sraz]nto]|o|pro|raz]>								ava-suff;	!-xladj-áva- -> cool
<{ч´ак} [[[za|po]nto]|do|iz|o|pri]>										va-suff;	!-čák-va -> wait

LEXICON jej-suff
<0:÷ {ј´еј} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»]>	Des;
